Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201748-614
Subpoenas; contumacy or disobedience; punishable as contempt; penalty.

The Commissioner of Labor, a hearing officer, or a duly authorized representative of the commissioner may petition a court to enforce a subpoena issued by the commissioner or a hearing officer in case of contumacy by any person or refusal of any person to obey such a subpoena. Any court of this state which has subject matter jurisdiction and has venue jurisdiction of the place where the person guilty of contumacy or refusal to obey is found, resides, or transacts business has jurisdiction to issue such person an order requiring him or her to appear before the commissioner, a hearing officer, or a duly authorized representative and to produce evidence or give testimony if so ordered touching the matter under investigation or in question. Any failure to obey such order of the court may be punished by the court as contempt. Any person who without just cause fails or refuses to attend and testify or to answer any lawful inquiry or to produce books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, and other records, if it is in his or her power so to do, in obedience to a subpoena of the commissioner, a hearing officer, or a duly authorized representative shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor. Each day such violation continues shall be a separate offense.

Laws 1937, c. 108, § 11, p. 393;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 48-711;

R.S.1943, § 48-614;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 291;

Laws 2001, LB 192, § 7;

Laws 2017, LB172, § 14.